Massachusetts, session 194th, H1057.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 57 of chapter 131 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after the word “mammal”, in line 3, the following words:- with
the exception of deer during open deer hunting season.
of 1